Missouri, session 2026, SB1379.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 589, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 589.710, to read as
follows:
589.710. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Bona fide researcher", any individual or
organization who:
(a) Agrees that any personally identifiable
information provided shall be used only for research and
statistical activities, and shall not be transferred,
revealed, or used for purposes other than research or
statistical activities, and that reports or publications
derived from this information shall not identify specific
individuals;
(b) Certifies that such individual or organization has
secured approval by the individual or organization's
institutional review board for the research or statistical
project that is the basis of the data access request; and
(c) If the individual or organization is requesting
access to any confidential, personally identifiable data,

SB 1379 2
certifies that the individual or organization has security
controls in place to prevent unauthorized access to any
confidential, personally identifiable data, and that these
controls have met the approval of the individual or
organization's institutional review board;
(2) "Criminal justice agency", any court with criminal
jurisdiction and any local, county, or state agency that
performs any activity directly relating to the detection or
investigation of crime; the apprehension, pretrial release,
post-trial release, prosecution, correctional supervision,
rehabilitation, evaluation, or treatment of accused persons
or criminal offenders; or criminal identification activities
or the collection, storage, or dissemination of arrest and
criminal records information;
(3) "Criminal justice data", all data collected,
created, received, maintained, or disseminated by any
criminal justice agency regardless of its physical form,
storage media, or conditions of use;
(4) "Institutional review board", any board,
committee, or other group that reviews, approves initiation
of, and conducts periodic review of research, and which has
received accreditation for this purpose or is part of an
accredited institution of higher learning;
(5) "Record", any information kept, held, filed,
produced, or reproduced by, with, or for a criminal justice
agency, in any physical or digital form whatsoever
including, but not limited to, reports, statements,
examinations, memoranda, opinions, folders, files, books,
manuals, pamphlets, forms, papers, designs, drawings, maps,
photos, letters, microfilms, computer tapes or discs, or
rules, regulations, or codes.

SB 1379 3
2. (1) A criminal justice agency shall share with a
bona fide researcher all criminal justice data and records,
including relevant personally identifying information and
demographic information, held by that agency relating to:
(a) A law enforcement stop, search, or seizure;
(b) A warrant, arrest, or citation;
(c) Participation in a pre-arrest or post-arrest
diversion, specialty court, or other alternative resolution
program;
(d) A criminal charge, disposition, or sentence;
(e) Pretrial or post-trial release from custody, or
any terms or conditions of release;
(f) A grant, order, change in the terms of, or
termination of pretrial supervised release, probation,
parole, or participation in correctional or rehabilitative
programs; or
(g) Formal discipline, reclassification, or relocation
of any person under criminal sentence or correctional
control.
(2) A criminal justice agency shall share with a bona
fide researcher all criminal justice data and records,
including relevant personally identifying information and
demographic information, held by that agency that is subject
to mandatory or discretionary disclosure to any member of
the public and not otherwise closed pursuant to chapter 610.
(3) A criminal justice agency may share with a bona
fide researcher any other criminal justice data, records, or
information, including relevant personally identifying
information and demographic information, held by that agency
that is responsive to a bona fide researcher's request.
(4) A release of criminal justice data, records, or
information under this section is not considered a release

SB 1379 4
of data, records, or information to the public for the
purposes of chapter 610 and does not waive the right to
assert in the future that data, records, or information may
be closed under chapter 610.
3. (1) Before February 28, 2027, the attorney general
shall issue guidance to assist criminal justice agencies in
complying with the requirements of this section, including a
process for identifying bona fide researchers and sharing
criminal justice data, records, and information with bona
fide researchers.
(2) A criminal justice agency may assess reasonable
fees, not to exceed actual costs, for the search, retrieval,
and copying of criminal justice data, records, or
information requested pursuant to this section, and may
waive fees at their discretion.
✓